fr: Catégorie de poids du fil: Afghan; Aran; Bébés; Chunky; Artisanat; DK; Feutrage; Doigté; Jumbo; Macramé; Roving; Tapis; Chaussette; Sports; Super volumineux; Worsted; Autre
cs: Hmotnostní kategorie příze: Afghánská; Aranská; Miminka; Hustá; Řemeslná; DK; Plstící; Prstová; Jumbo; Macramé; Vláknová; Kobercová; Ponožková; Sporty; Super objemná; Česaná; Jiné
sk-SK: Hmotnostná kategória priadze: Afganský; Aran; Babies; Chunky; Craft; DK; Felting; Fingering; Jumbo; Macramé; Roving; Rug; Sock; Sports; Super objemné; Česaný; Iné
ko: 털실 중량 카테고리: 아프가니스탄; 아란; 아기; 청키; 크래프트; DK; 펠팅; 핑거링; 점보; 마크라메; 로빙; 러그; 양말; 스포츠; 슈퍼 벌키; 소모사; 기타
lt-LT: Siūlų svorio kategorija: „Afgan“ nėrimas; „Aran“ nėrimas; Kūdikiams; Stori; Rankdarbiams; DK; Vėlimui; Plonas; „Jumbo“; Macramé; Ilgas ir plonas; Kilimėliai; Kojinės; Sportas; Itin storas; Vidutinio storio; Kita
zh-CN: 纱线克重类别: 阿富汗; 阿兰; 婴儿类; 单股粗线; 工艺; DK; 毡; 细绒线; 特大; 纤维编织; 粗纱; 地毯; 短袜; 体育; 极粗; 精纺; 其他
pt-PT: Categoria de peso do fio: Afegão; Aran; Bebés; Volumoso; Trabalhos manuais; DK; Feltragem; Dedilhado; Jumbo; Macramé; Tecer; Tapete; Meia; Desportivo; Super volumoso; Lã penteada; Outro
da: Garnvægtkategori: Afghansk; Aran; Babyer; Tykt; Håndværk; DK; Filtning; Fingersætning; Jumbo; Macramé; Roving; Tæppe; Sok; Sport; Super omfangsrigt; Worsted; Andet
hr-HR: Težinska kategorija pređe: Afghan; Aran; Bebe; Debela; Rukotvorine; DK; Filcanje; Pletenje prstima; Jumbo; Makrame; Roving; Sag; Čarape; Sport; Posebno debela; Vunena; Ostalo
pt-BR: Categoria de peso do fio: Afegão; Arã; Bebês; Grosso; Artesanal; DK; Feltragem; Fingering; Jumbo; Macramé; Roving; Tapete; Meia; Esportes; Supervolumoso; Worsted; Outro
ja: 毛糸の太さのカテゴリー: アフガン; アラン; 赤ちゃん; チャンキー; クラフト; DK; フェルティング; フィンガリング; ジャンボ; マクラメ; ロービング; ラグ; ソック; スポーツ; スーパーバルキー; ウーステッド; その他
ru: Весовая категория пряжи: Афганская; Аран; Детская; Толстая; Рукоделие; DK; Валяние; Аппликатура; Джамбо; Макраме; Ровинг; Коврик; Носки; Спорт; Очень толстая; Камвольная; Другое
hu: Fonal súlykategóriája: Afgán; Aran; Bébik; Vaskos; Kézműves; DK; Nemezelés; Ujjazás; Jumbo; Makramé; Roháni; Kisszőnyeg; Zokni; Sport; Szuper terjedelmes; Gyapjúfonal; Egyéb
en: Yarn weight category: Afghan; Aran; Babies; Chunky; Craft; DK; Felting; Fingering; Jumbo; Macramé; Roving; Rug; Sock; Sports; Super bulky; Worsted; Other
ro-RO: Categoria de greutate a firului: Afghan; Aran; Fin; Voluminos; Meșteșuguri; DK; Împâslire; Tricotaje de mână; Jumbo; Macramé; Semitort; Mochetă; Ciorap; Sport; Super voluminos; Lână pieptănată; Altele
el: Κατηγορία βάρους νήματος: Αφγανός; Αράν; Μωρά; Χοντρός; Σκάφος; DK; Feltting; Δάχτυλο; Jumbo; Macramé; Περιπλανώμενος; Χαλί; Μπότες κάλτσα; Αθλητισμός; Σούπερ ογκώδες; Μαλλί εστριμμένο; Άλλο
sv: Garnviktskategori: Afghan; Aran; Babies; Tjockt; Hantverk; DK; Filtning; Fingrar; Jumbo; Macramé; Roving; Matta; Strumpa; Sporter; Mycket skrymmande; Kamgarn; Övrigt
vi: Loại trọng lượng sợi: Afghan; Aran; Baby; Chunky; Craft; DK; Felting; Fingering; Jumbo; Macramé; Roving; Rug; Sock; Thể thao; Super bulky; Worsted; Khác
nl: Categorie draadgarengewicht: Afghaans; Aran; Baby's; Grof; Ambachtelijk; DK; Vilten; Dunne wol; Jumbo; Macramé; Roving; Vloerkleed; Sok; Sporten; Super omvangrijk; Kamgaren; Andere
nb: Vektkategori for garn: Afghan; Aran; Babyer; Tykk; Håndverk; DK; Toving; Fingersetting; Jumbo; Macramé; Roving; Teppe; Sokk; Sport; Superkraftig; Ullgarn; Annet
fi: Langan painoluokka: Afgaani; Aran; Vauvat; Paksu; Harrastus; DK; Huovutus; Sormitus; Jumbo; Macramé; Kiertämätön; Matto; Sukka; Urheilu; Erittäin paksu; Kampalanka; Muu
th: หมวดหมู่น้ำหนักเส้นด้าย: อัฟกัน; อารัน; เบบี้; ชังกี; งานฝีมือ; DK; เฟลติ้ง; ฟิงเกอร์ริง; จัมโบ้; มาคราเม; โรฟวิง; พรม; ถุงเท้า; กีฬาต่างๆ; ซูเปอร์บัลกี; ด้ายขนสัตว์; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Kategorija teže preje: Afghan; Aran; Dojenčki; Debela; Craft; DK; Polstenje; S prsti; Jumbo; Makrame; Česana preja; Preproga; Nogavice; Šport; Izjemno debela; Kamgarn; Drugo
tr: İplik ağırlık kategorisi: Afgan; Aran; Bebek; Tıknaz; El işi; İkili örgü; Keçe; İnce örgü; Jumbo; Makrome; Fitil; Kilim; Çorap; Spor dalları; Kalın; Kamgarn; Diğer
es: Categoría de peso de la lana: Afgano; Aran; Bebés; Grueso; Manualidades; DK; Fieltro; Fingering; Jumbo; Macramé; Fibra cardada; Alfombra; Calcetín; Deportes; Supergrueso; Estambre; Otros
de: Garngewichtskategorie: Afghanisch; Aran; Babys; Klobig; Handwerk; DK; Filzen; Fingersatz; Jumbo; Makramé; Roving; Teppich; Socke; Sportarten; Besonders sperrig; Kammgarn; Sonstiges
pl: Kategoria wagowa przędzy: afgańska; Aran; Niemowlęta; Z kawałkami; Rzemiosło; DK; Filc; Aplikatura; Jumbo; Makrama; Niedoprzęd; Dywan; Skarpeta; Sport; Super masowy; Kamgarn; Inne
it: Categoria di peso del filato: Afgano; Aran; Bebè; Gigante; Artigianale; DK; Feltratura; Tastamento; Jumbo; Macramé; Roving; Tappeto; Calza; Sport; Super ingombrante; Pettinato; Altro
zh-TW: 紗線重量類別: 阿富汗紗; 阿蘭紗; 嬰兒紗; 厚實紗; 工藝紗; DK 紗; 氈制紗; 指法紗; 巨型紗; Macramé 紗; 粗紗; 地毯紗; 襪線紗; 體育; 超厚重紗; 精紡毛料紗; 其他
bg-BG: Категория тегло на преждата: Афган; Аран; Бебе; Чуплива; Занаятчийска; DK; Плъстене; Фингъринг; Джъмбо; Макраме; Роувинг; Килим; Чорап; Спорт; Супер обемиста; Камгарна; Други